Oklahoma, session 2025, SB971.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 104 of Title 66, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Certified crew member” means an employee involved in the


operation of a railroad train, including a certified engineer or a


certified conductor, and not including a hostler service employee,


utility employee, or contractor;


2. “Helper service” means the use of a locomotive or group of


locomotives to assist another railroad train that is experiencing


mechanical failure or lacks the power to traverse difficult terrain,



Req. No. 811 Page 1


including the travel to or from the location where the assistance is


provided; and


3. “Hostler service” means the movement of locomotives that are


not attached to rail cars within a rail yard.


B. Any person, firm, or corporation operating a railroad train


in connection with carrying freight in this state shall have at


least two certified crew members aboard the railroad train while the


railroad train is in motion.


C. The provisions of this section shall not apply to:


1. Trains that are used primarily for the purpose of


transporting people from one location to another or are used for


tourism purposes such as scenic, historic, or excursion rides;


2. A locomotive or group or locomotives that are traveling no


faster than thirty (30) miles per hour outside of a rail yard and


are attached only to a caboose;


3. Helper service;


4. Hostler service; and


5. The movement of a train for the purpose of loading or


unloading freight, provided that the train is moving no faster than


ten (10) miles per hour.


D. The Department of Public Safety shall have the authority to


issue a citation to any person, firm, or corporation that violates


the provisions of this section. Such person, firm, or corporation


shall be subject to a fine:

Req. No. 811 Page 2


1. Not less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) nor more


than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for a first offense;


2. More than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) but not to exceed


Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for a second offense committed


within three (3) years; or


3. More than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) but not to


exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for a third or subsequent


offense committed within three (3) years.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-811 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:46:58 AM



















Req. No. 811 Page 3